Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7458
Enforcement of act.

The department, the Attorney General, or any county attorney may institute an action in the name of the state for an injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent any violation of the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7425;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 32.